Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.520

School credit for participation in youth court.

Local school boards may provide for school credit for participation as a member of a youth court as defined in RCW 3.72.005 or 13.40.020 or a student court pursuant to RCW 28A.300.420.

[ 2002 c 237 s 18.]